Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-8,191.01
Board; powers; rules and regulations;
conflict of interest.

The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which
are needed in performing its duties. Such rules and regulations include, but are not limited to, a definition of conflict of interest
for board members and the appropriate procedure to follow when a conflict
arises. The rules and regulations or a code of professional conduct developed
by the board shall also include definitions of or a list of specific practices
which constitute fraud, deceit, gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct
and the punishments for such practices which shall be used as the basis to
place a professional landscape
architect on probation or revoke or suspend a license pursuant
to section 81-8,202.

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 7.
July 19, 2012